Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3437
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 94.